Utah statutes.
10-7-67.   Pleading -- Reference to ordinance -- Judgment enforced by imprisonment.

In all actions for the violation of any ordinance it shall be sufficient if the complaint refers to the title and section of the ordinance under which such action is brought. Any person upon whom any fine or penalty shall be imposed may upon the order of the court before whom the conviction is had be committed to the county jail or the city prison or to such other place as may be provided for the incarceration of offenders until such fine, penalty and costs shall be fully paid. 

